Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.080

Oath—District judges—Court commissioners.

Each district judge, district judge pro tempore and district court commissioner shall, before entering upon the duties of office, take an oath to support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of Washington, and to perform the duties of the office faithfully and impartially and to the best of his or her ability.

[ 1984 c 258 s 14; 1961 c 299 s 17.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.